Utah statutes.
31A-22-804.   Limitations on amounts of insurance.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), the initial amount of credit
life insurance on the life of any one debtor may not exceed the total amount
repayable under the contract of indebtedness.  Where an indebtedness is
repayable in substantially equal periodic installments, the amount of
insurance may not exceed the scheduled or actual amount of unpaid
indebtedness, whichever is greater.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to:
(a)  insurance on agricultural credit transaction commitments not exceeding
the commitment period, which may be written for the amount of the commitment
on a nondecreasing or level term plan;
(b)  insurance on educational credit transaction commitments, which may be
written to include the portion of the commitment that has not been advanced by
the creditor;
(c)  insurance on preauthorized lines of credit not exceeding the commitment
period which may be written for the preauthorized amount on a nondecreasing or
level term plan, whether secured or unsecured; and
(d)  insurance on any other class of lawful credit transaction or commitment,
which in the commissioner's opinion does not require the application of the
restrictions under Subsection (1), in which case the commissioner may
authorize by rule a class exception to Subsection (1).
(3)  The total amount of indemnity payable by credit accident and health
insurance in the event of disability, as defined in the policy, may not exceed
the aggregate of the periodic scheduled unpaid installments of the
indebtedness.  The amount of each periodic indemnity payment may not exceed
the total amount repayable under the contract of indebtedness divided by the
number of periodic installments.
